vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Yoga và Pilate: Máy tập thể dục; Bóng tập Yoga & Pilates; Chăn tập Yoga & Pilates; Gạch kê để tập yoga và pilate; Gối ôm & đệm tập Yoga & Pilates; Thảm tập yoga và thể dục thẩm mỹ; Vòng tập Yoga & Pilates; Dây kháng lực & dây kéo giãn Yoga & Pilates; Khăn tập yoga và pilate; Quai đeo và túi đựng thảm tập yoga; Vòng tập Yoga
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Yoga e pilates: Macchine pilates; Palle da yoga e pilates; Coperte da yoga e pilates; Blocchi per yoga e pilates; Cuscini e bolster da yoga e pilates; Tappetini yoga e pilates; Anelli da yoga e pilates; Cinghie e fasce da stretching per yoga e pilates; Teli per yoga e pilates; Borse e cinghie per tappetini yoga; Ruote da yoga
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Yoga ve Pilates: Pilates Makineleri; Yoga ve pilates topları; Yoga ve pilates battaniyeleri; Yoga ve Pilates Blokları; Yoga ve pilates destek minderleri ve yastıkları; Yoga ve Pilates Matları; Yoga ve pilates çemberleri; Yoga ve pilates esneme kayışları ve bantları; Yoga ve Pilates Havluları; Yoga Mat Çantaları; Yoga tekerlekleri
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Joga in pilates: Naprave za pilates; Žoge za jogo in pilates; Odeje za jogo in pilates; Bloki za jogo in pilates; Vzglavniki in blazine za jogo in pilates; Podloge za jogo in pilates; Obroči za jogo in pilates; Raztezalni trakovi za jogo in pilates; Brisače za jogo in pilates; Torbe in naramnice za podlogo za jogo; Joga kolesa
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Йога и пилатес: Машини за пилатес; Топки за йога и пилатес; Одеяла за йога и пилатес; Блокчета за йога и пилатес; Възглавници и опори за йога и пилатес; Постелки за йога и пилатес; Пръстени за йога и пилатес; Ленти и колани за разтягане за йога и пилатес; Кърпи за йога и пилатес; Чанти и презрамки за постелки за йога; Йога колела
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 요가/필라테스: 필라테스 기구; 요가 및 필라테스 공; 요가 및 필라테스 담요; 요가/필라테스 블록; 요가 및 필라테스 볼스터 및 쿠션; 요가/필라테스 매트; 요가 및 필라테스 링; 요가 및 필라테스 스트레치 스트랩 및 밴드; 요가/필라테스 타월; 요가 매트 가방/끈; 요가 휠
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Joga i pilates: Sprave za pilates; Lopte za jogu i pilates; Deke za jogu i pilates; Cigle za jogu i pilates; Jastučići i podupirači za jogu i pilates; Prostirke za jogu i pilates; Prstenovi za jogu i pilates; Trake za rastezanje za jogu i pilates; Ručnici za jogu i pilates; Torbe i naramenice za prostirke za jogu; Kotači za jogu
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Йога и пилатес: Тренажеры для пилатеса; Мячи для йоги и пилатеса; Одеяла для йоги и пилатеса; Блоки для йоги и пилатеса; Болстеры и подушки для йоги и пилатеса; Коврики для йоги и пилатеса; Кольца для йоги и пилатеса; Ремни и ленты для йоги и пилатеса; Полотенца для йоги и пилатеса; Сумки и ремни для ковриков для йоги; Колеса для йоги
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Yoga și Pilates: Aparate pentru Pilates; Mingi de yoga și pilates; Pături de yoga și pilates; Blocuri pentru yoga și Pilates; Perne și suporturi pentru yoga și pilates; Covorașe pentru yoga și Pilates; Inele de yoga și pilates; Curele și benzi de stretching pentru yoga și pilates; Prosoape pentru yoga și Pilates; Genți și curele pentru saltele de yoga; Roți de yoga
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ヨガ・ピラティス: ピラティスマシン; ヨガ・ピラティスボール; ヨガ・ピラティス用ブランケット; ヨガブロック; ヨガ・ピラティス用ボルスター・クッション; ヨガマット・ピラティスマット; ヨガ・ピラティスリング; ヨガ・ピラティス用ストレッチストラップ・バンド; ヨガ・ピラティス用タオル; ヨガマットケース; ヨガホイール
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Pilates et yoga: Machines pilates; Ballons de yoga et Pilates; Couvertures de yoga et Pilates; Blocs de yoga et Pilates; Bolsters et coussins de yoga et Pilates; Tapis pilates et yoga; Anneaux de yoga et Pilates; Sangles et bandes d’étirement pour yoga et Pilates; Serviettes de yoga et Pilates; Sacs pour matelas de yoga; Roues de yoga
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Yoga och pilates: Pilatesmaskiner; Yoga- och pilatesbollar; Yoga- och pilatesfiltar; Block för yoga och pilates; Bolster och kuddar för yoga och pilates; Yoga- och pilatesmattor; Yoga- och pilatesringar; Stretchband för yoga och pilates; Handdukar för yoga och pilates; Yogamattpåsar; Yogahjul
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Jóga és pilátesz: Piláteszgépek; Jóga- és Pilates-labdák; Jóga- és Pilates-takarók; Jóga- és piláteszblokkok; Jóga- és Pilates-hengerek és -párnák; Jóga- és piláteszszőnyegek; Jóga- és Pilates-gyűrűk; Jóga- és Pilates-nyújtószalagok és -kötelek; Jóga- és pilátesztörölközők; Jógaszőnyeg-táskák és -pántok; Jógakerekek
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Γιόγκα & Pilates: Μηχανήματα Pilates; Μπάλες γιόγκα και πιλάτες; Κουβέρτες γιόγκα και πιλάτες; Μπλοκ γιόγκα & Pilates; Μαξιλάρια υποστήριξης και μαξιλάρια γιόγκα και πιλάτες; Χαλάκια γιόγκα & πιλάτες; Δαχτυλίδια γιόγκα και πιλάτες; Ιμάντες και λάστιχα διάτασης γιόγκα και πιλάτες; Πετσέτες για γιόγκα & πιλάτες; Τσάντες & ιμάντες στρώματος γιόγκα; Τροχοί γιόγκα
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Yoga og pilates: Pilatesmaskiner; Bolde til yoga og pilates; Tæpper til yoga og pilates; Yoga- og pilatesblokke; Pøller og puder til yoga og pilates; Yoga- og pilatesmåtter; Ringe til yoga og pilates; Strækstropper og elastikker til yoga og pilates; Yoga- og pilatestæpper; Tasker og stropper til yogamåtter; Yogahjul
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Jooga ja pilates: Pilateslaitteet; Jooga- ja pilatespallot; Jooga- ja pilatespeitot; Jooga- ja pilatesblokit; Joogan ja pilateksen bolsterit ja tyynyt; Jooga- ja pilatesmatot; Jooga- ja pilatesrenkaat; Joogan ja pilateksen venytysvyöt ja -nauhat; Jooga- ja pilatespyyhkeet; Joogamattokassit ja kantonauhat; Joogapyörät
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Yoga y pilates: Máquinas de pilates; Pelotas de yoga y pilates; Mantas de yoga y pilates; Bloques para yoga y pilates; Cojines y almohadones de yoga y pilates; Esteras para pilates y yoga; Aros de yoga y pilates; Correas y bandas de estiramiento para yoga y pilates; Toallas para yoga y pilates; Bolsas para esterillas de yoga; Ruedas de yoga
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Yoga e Pilates: Aparelhos para pilates; Bolas de yoga e pilates; Cobertores de yoga e pilates; Blocos de yoga e pilates; Almofadas e bolsters de yoga e pilates; Tapetes de yoga e pilates; Anéis de yoga e pilates; Faixas e fitas de alongamento para yoga e pilates; Toalhas de yoga e pilates; Sacolas para tapete de ioga; Rodas de yoga
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Ioga e pilates: Máquinas de pilates; Bolas de ioga e Pilates; Mantas de ioga e Pilates; Blocos de ioga e pilates; Almofadas cilíndricas de ioga e Pilates; Tapetes de ioga e pilates; Anéis de ioga e Pilates; Cintos e bandas de alongamento de ioga e Pilates; Toalhas de ioga e pilates; Fitas e sacos para tapetes de ioga; Rodas de ioga
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 瑜珈和皮拉提斯: 皮拉提斯機; 瑜珈與皮拉提斯球; 瑜珈與皮拉提斯毯; 瑜珈/皮拉提斯用磚; 瑜珈與皮拉提斯枕墊; 瑜珈/皮拉提斯墊; 瑜珈與皮拉提斯圈; 瑜珈與皮拉提斯伸展帶; 瑜珈/皮拉提斯舖巾; 瑜珈墊背包/背帶; 瑜珈輪
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Joga i pilates: Sprzęt do pilatesu; Piłki do jogi i pilatesu; Koce do jogi i pilatesu; Klocki do jogi i pilatesu; Wałki i poduszki do jogi i pilatesu; Maty do jogi i pilatesu; Obręcze do jogi i pilatesu; Paski i gumy do rozciągania (joga i pilates); Ręczniki do jogi i pilatesu; Pokrowce na maty do jogi; Koła do jogi
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 瑜伽与普拉提: 普拉提健身器; 瑜伽和普拉提球; 瑜伽和普拉提毯; 瑜珈与普拉提砖; 瑜伽和普拉提抱枕与靠垫; 瑜伽与普拉提垫子; 瑜伽和普拉提圈; 瑜伽和普拉提拉伸带与阻力带; 瑜珈与普拉提毛巾; 瑜伽垫包/捆扎带; 瑜伽轮
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Joga ir pilatesas: Pilateso treniruokliai; Jogos ir pilateso kamuoliai; Jogos ir pilateso antklodės; Jogos ir pilateso blokeliai; Jogos ir pilateso pagalvėlės ir paminkštinimai; Jogos ir pilateso kilimėliai; Jogos ir pilateso žiedai; Jogos ir pilateso tempimo diržai ir juostos; Jogos ir pilateso rankšluosčiai; Jogos kilimėlių krepšiai ir diržai; Jogos ratai
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Jóga a pilates: Trenažéry na pilates; Míče na jógu a pilates; Deky na jógu a pilates; Cihličky na jógu a pilates; Bolstery a polštáře na jógu a pilates; Cvičební podložky na jógu a pilates; Kruhy na jógu a pilates; Pásky a popruhy na jógu a pilates; Ručníky na jógu a pilates; Tašky na podložky na jógu; Jógová kola
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Yoga en pilates: Pilatesapparaten; Yoga- en pilatesballen; Yoga- en pilatesdekens; Yoga- en pilatesblokken; Yoga- en pilatesbolsters en -kussens; Yoga- en pilatesmatten; Yoga- en pilatesringen; Yoga- en pilatesstretchriemen en -banden; Yoga- en pilateshanddoeken; Tassen voor yogamatten; Yogawielen
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Yoga & Pilates: Pilates Machines; Yoga & Pilates Balls; Yoga & Pilates Blankets; Yoga & Pilates Blocks; Yoga & Pilates Bolsters & Cushions; Yoga & Pilates Mats; Yoga & Pilates Rings; Yoga & Pilates Stretch Straps & Bands; Yoga & Pilates Towels; Yoga Mat Bags & Straps; Yoga Wheels
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > โยคะและพิลาทีส: เครื่องพิลาทีส; ลูกบอลโยคะและพิลาทิส; ผ้าห่มโยคะและพิลาทิส; บล็อกสำหรับโยคะและพิลาทีส; หมอนรองและเบาะโยคะและพิลาทิส; แผ่นรองสำหรับโยคะและพิลาทีส; ห่วงโยคะและพิลาทิส; สายและยางยืดโยคะและพิลาทิส; ผ้าสำหรับโยคะและพิลาทีส; กระเป๋าและสายคล้องเสื่อโยคะ; วงล้อโยคะ
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Yoga og pilates: Pilatesmaskiner; Yoga- og pilatesballer; Yoga- og pilatestepper; Yoga- og pilatesblokker; Yoga- og pilatesbolstere og -puter; Yoga- og pilatesmatter; Yoga- og pilatesringer; Tøyestropper og treningsstrikker for yoga og pilates; Yoga- og pilateshåndklær; Vesker og stropper til yogamatter; Yogahjul
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Joga a pilates: Vybavenie na pilates; Lopty na jogu a pilates; Deky na jogu a pilates; Bloky na jogu a pilates; Podložky a vankúše na jogu a pilates; Podložky na jogu a pilates; Kruhy na jogu a pilates; Strečové popruhy a gumy na jogu a pilates; Uteráky na jogu a pilates; Tašky a popruhy na jogovú podložku; Kolesá na jogu
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Yoga & Pilates: Pilates-Geräte; Yoga- & Pilates-Bälle; Yoga- & Pilates-Decken; Yoga- & Pilatesblöcke; Yoga- & Pilates-Bolster & -Kissen; Yoga- & Pilatesmatten; Yoga- & Pilatesringe; Yoga- & Pilates-Gurte & -Bänder; Yoga- & Pilatestücher; Beutel für Yogamatten; Yoga-Räder